test/src/gt-desc-yamls/case-endings-vowels-regular_gt-desc.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../src/generator-gt-desc.hfst
    Morph: ../../src/analyser-gt-desc.hfst

Tests:

  # Nouns with vowel endings

  Standard nouns ending in -a:
    # Singular
    cirya+N+Sing: cirya
    cirya+N+Sing+Nom: cirya
    cirya+N+Sing+Acc: cirya
    cirya+N+Sing+Gen: ciryo
    cirya+N+Sing+Ins: ciryanen
    cirya+N+Sing+All: ciryanna
    cirya+N+Sing+Dat: ciryan
    cirya+N+Sing+Loc: ciryasse
    cirya+N+Sing+Loc+Short: ciryas
    cirya+N+Sing+Abl: ciryallo
    cirya+N+Sing+Poss: cirya{w}a
    # Dual
    cirya+N+Dual: [ciryat, ciryu]
    cirya+N+Dual+Nom: [ciryat, ciryu]
    cirya+N+Dual+Acc: [ciryat, ciryu]
    cirya+N+Dual+Gen: [ciryato, ciryuo]
    cirya+N+Dual+Ins: [ciryanten, ciryunen]
    cirya+N+Dual+All: [ciryanta, ciryunna]
    cirya+N+Dual+Dat: [ciryant, ciryun, ciryuen]
    cirya+N+Dual+Loc: [ciryatse, ciryusse]
    cirya+N+Dual+Loc+Short: ciryus  # also ciryates ???
    cirya+N+Dual+Abl: [ciryalto, ciryullo]
    cirya+N+Dual+Poss: ['ciryat{w}a', 'ciryu{w}a']
    # Plural
    cirya+N+Plur: ciryar
    cirya+N+Plur+Nom: ciryar
    cirya+N+Plur+Acc: ciryar
    cirya+N+Plur+Gen: ciryaron
    cirya+N+Plur+Ins: ciryainen
    cirya+N+Plur+All: ciryannar
    cirya+N+Plur+Dat: ciryain
    cirya+N+Plur+Loc: ciryassen
    cirya+N+Plur+Loc+Short: ciryais
    cirya+N+Plur+Abl: [ciryallon, ciryallor]
    cirya+N+Plur+Poss: ciryai{w}a
    # Partitive Plural
    cirya+N+Plur+Par: ciryali
    cirya+N+Plur+Par+Nom: ciryali
    cirya+N+Plur+Par+Acc: ciryali
    cirya+N+Plur+Par+Gen: ciryalion
    cirya+N+Plur+Par+Ins: ciryalínen
    cirya+N+Plur+Par+All: [ciryalinnar, ciryalinna]
    cirya+N+Plur+Par+Dat: ciryalin
    cirya+N+Plur+Par+Loc: [ciryalissen, ciryalisse]
    cirya+N+Plur+Par+Loc+Short: ciryalis
    cirya+N+Plur+Par+Abl: [ciryalillon, ciryalillor, ciryalillo]
    cirya+N+Plur+Par+Poss: ciryalí{w}a
  
  Standard nouns ending in -o:
    # Singular
    rocco+N+Sing: rocco
    rocco+N+Sing+Nom: rocco
    rocco+N+Sing+Acc: rocco
    rocco+N+Sing+Gen: rocco
    rocco+N+Sing+Ins: rocconen
    rocco+N+Sing+All: rocconna
    rocco+N+Sing+Dat: roccon
    rocco+N+Sing+Loc: roccosse
    rocco+N+Sing+Loc+Short: roccos
    rocco+N+Sing+Abl: roccollo
    rocco+N+Sing+Poss: rocco{w}a
    # Dual
    rocco+N+Dual: [roccot, roccu]
    rocco+N+Dual+Nom: [roccot, roccu]
    rocco+N+Dual+Acc: [roccot, roccu]
    rocco+N+Dual+Gen: [roccoto, roccuo]
    rocco+N+Dual+Ins: [rocconten, roccunen]
    rocco+N+Dual+All: [rocconta, roccunna]
    rocco+N+Dual+Dat: [roccont, roccun, roccuen]
    rocco+N+Dual+Loc: [roccotse, roccusse]
    rocco+N+Dual+Loc+Short: roccus  # also roccotes ???
    rocco+N+Dual+Abl: [roccolto, roccullo]
    rocco+N+Dual+Poss: ['roccot{w}a', 'roccu{w}a']
    # Plural
    rocco+N+Plur: roccor
    rocco+N+Plur+Nom: roccor
    rocco+N+Plur+Acc: roccor
    rocco+N+Plur+Gen: roccoron
    rocco+N+Plur+Ins: roccoinen
    rocco+N+Plur+All: rocconnar
    rocco+N+Plur+Dat: roccoin
    rocco+N+Plur+Loc: roccossen
    rocco+N+Plur+Loc+Short: roccois
    rocco+N+Plur+Abl: [roccollon, roccollor]
    rocco+N+Plur+Poss: roccoi{w}a
    # Partitive Plural
    rocco+N+Plur+Par: roccoli
    rocco+N+Plur+Par+Nom: roccoli
    rocco+N+Plur+Par+Acc: roccoli
    rocco+N+Plur+Par+Gen: roccolion
    rocco+N+Plur+Par+Ins: roccolínen
    rocco+N+Plur+Par+All: [roccolinnar, roccolinna]
    rocco+N+Plur+Par+Dat: roccolin
    rocco+N+Plur+Par+Loc: [roccolissen, roccolisse]
    rocco+N+Plur+Par+Loc+Short: roccolis
    rocco+N+Plur+Par+Abl: [roccolillon, roccolillor, roccolillo]
    rocco+N+Plur+Par+Poss: roccolí{w}a
  
  Standard nouns ending in -i:
    # Singular
    tári+N+Sing: tári
    tári+N+Sing+Nom: tári
    tári+N+Sing+Acc: tári
    tári+N+Sing+Gen: tário
    tári+N+Sing+Ins: tárinen
    tári+N+Sing+All: tárinna
    tári+N+Sing+Dat: tárin
    tári+N+Sing+Loc: tárisse
    tári+N+Sing+Loc+Short: táris
    tári+N+Sing+Abl: tárillo
    tári+N+Sing+Poss: tári{w}a
    # Dual
    tári+N+Dual: [tárit, táru]
    tári+N+Dual+Nom: [tárit, táru]
    tári+N+Dual+Acc: [tárit, táru]
    tári+N+Dual+Gen: [tárito, táruo]
    tári+N+Dual+Ins: [tárinten, tárunen]
    tári+N+Dual+All: [tárinta, tárunna]
    tári+N+Dual+Dat: [tárint, tárun, táruen]
    tári+N+Dual+Loc: [táritse, tárusse]
    tári+N+Dual+Loc+Short: tárus  # also tárites ???
    tári+N+Dual+Abl: [tárilto, tárullo]
    tári+N+Dual+Poss: ['tárit{w}a', 'táru{w}a']
    # Plural
    tári+N+Plur: tárir
    tári+N+Plur+Nom: tárir
    tári+N+Plur+Acc: tárir
    tári+N+Plur+Gen: táriron
    tári+N+Plur+Ins: [tárínen, tárinen]
    tári+N+Plur+All: tárinnar
    tári+N+Plur+Dat: [tárín, tárin]
    tári+N+Plur+Loc: tárissen
    tári+N+Plur+Loc+Short: [tárís, táris]
    tári+N+Plur+Abl: [tárillon, tárillor]
    tári+N+Plur+Poss: ['tárí{w}a', 'tári{w}a']
    # Partitive Plural
    tári+N+Plur+Par: tárili
    tári+N+Plur+Par+Nom: tárili
    tári+N+Plur+Par+Acc: tárili
    tári+N+Plur+Par+Gen: tárilion
    tári+N+Plur+Par+Ins: tárilínen
    tári+N+Plur+Par+All: [tárilinnar, tárilinna]
    tári+N+Plur+Par+Dat: tárilin
    tári+N+Plur+Par+Loc: [tárilissen, tárilisse]
    tári+N+Plur+Par+Loc+Short: tárilis
    tári+N+Plur+Par+Abl: [tárilillon, tárilillor, tárilillo]
    tári+N+Plur+Par+Poss: tárilí{w}a
  
  Standard nouns ending in -u:
    # Singular
    nénu+N+Sing: nénu
    nénu+N+Sing+Nom: nénu
    nénu+N+Sing+Acc: nénu
    nénu+N+Sing+Gen: nénuo
    nénu+N+Sing+Ins: nénunen
    nénu+N+Sing+All: nénunna
    nénu+N+Sing+Dat: nénun
    nénu+N+Sing+Loc: nénusse
    nénu+N+Sing+Loc+Short: nénus
    nénu+N+Sing+Abl: nénullo
    nénu+N+Sing+Poss: nénu{w}a
    # Dual
    nénu+N+Dual: [nénut, nénu]
    nénu+N+Dual+Nom: [nénut, nénu]
    nénu+N+Dual+Acc: [nénut, nénu]
    nénu+N+Dual+Gen: [nénuto, nénuo]
    nénu+N+Dual+Ins: [nénunten, nénunen]
    nénu+N+Dual+All: [nénunta, nénunna]
    nénu+N+Dual+Dat: [nénunt, nénun, nénuen]
    nénu+N+Dual+Loc: [nénutse, nénusse]
    nénu+N+Dual+Loc+Short: nénus  # also nénutes ???
    nénu+N+Dual+Abl: [nénulto, nénullo]
    nénu+N+Dual+Poss: ['nénut{w}a', 'nénu{w}a']
    # Plural
    nénu+N+Plur: nénur
    nénu+N+Plur+Nom: nénur
    nénu+N+Plur+Acc: nénur
    nénu+N+Plur+Gen: nénuron
    nénu+N+Plur+Ins: nénuinen
    nénu+N+Plur+All: nénunnar
    nénu+N+Plur+Dat: nénuin
    nénu+N+Plur+Loc: nénussen
    nénu+N+Plur+Loc+Short: nénuis
    nénu+N+Plur+Abl: [nénullon, nénullor]
    nénu+N+Plur+Poss: nénui{w}a
    # Partitive Plural
    nénu+N+Plur+Par: nénuli
    nénu+N+Plur+Par+Nom: nénuli
    nénu+N+Plur+Par+Acc: nénuli
    nénu+N+Plur+Par+Gen: nénulion
    nénu+N+Plur+Par+Ins: nénulínen
    nénu+N+Plur+Par+All: [nénulinnar, nénulinna]
    nénu+N+Plur+Par+Dat: nénulin
    nénu+N+Plur+Par+Loc: [nénulissen, nénulisse]
    nénu+N+Plur+Par+Loc+Short: nénulis
    nénu+N+Plur+Par+Abl: [nénulillon, nénulillor, nénulillo]
    nénu+N+Plur+Par+Poss: nénulí{w}a
  
  Standard nouns ending in -ie (which include {+}):
    # Singular
    tyalië+N+Sing: tyalie
    tyalië+N+Sing+Nom: tyalie
    tyalië+N+Sing+Acc: tyalie
    tyalië+N+Sing+Gen: [tyalieo, tyaliéo]
    tyalië+N+Sing+Ins: [tyalienen, tyaliénen]
    tyalië+N+Sing+All: tyalienna
    tyalië+N+Sing+Dat: tyalien
    tyalië+N+Sing+Loc: tyaliesse
    tyalië+N+Sing+Loc+Short: tyalies
    tyalië+N+Sing+Abl: tyaliello
    tyalië+N+Sing+Poss: ['tyalie{w}a', 'tyalié{w}a']
    # Dual
    tyalië+N+Dual: [tyaliet, tyaliu]
    tyalië+N+Dual+Nom: [tyaliet, tyaliu]
    tyalië+N+Dual+Acc: [tyaliet, tyaliu]
    tyalië+N+Dual+Gen: [tyalieto, tyaliéto, tyaliuo]
    tyalië+N+Dual+Ins: [tyalienten, tyaliunen]
    tyalië+N+Dual+All: [tyalienta, tyaliunna]
    tyalië+N+Dual+Dat: [tyalient, tyaliun, tyaliuen]
    tyalië+N+Dual+Loc: [tyalietse, tyaliusse]
    tyalië+N+Dual+Loc+Short: tyalius  # also tyalietes ???
    tyalië+N+Dual+Abl: [tyalielto, tyaliullo]
    tyalië+N+Dual+Poss: ['tyaliet{w}a', 'tyaliu{w}a']
    # Plural
    tyalië+N+Plur: tyalier
    tyalië+N+Plur+Nom: tyalier
    tyalië+N+Plur+Acc: tyalier
    tyalië+N+Plur+Gen: [tyalieron, tyaliéron]
    tyalië+N+Plur+Ins: tyaliénen
    tyalië+N+Plur+All: tyaliennar
    tyalië+N+Plur+Dat: tyalién
    tyalië+N+Plur+Loc: tyaliessen
    tyalië+N+Plur+Loc+Short: tyaliés
    tyalië+N+Plur+Abl: [tyaliellon, tyaliellor]
    tyalië+N+Plur+Poss: tyalié{w}a
    # Partitive Plural
    tyalië+N+Plur+Par: [tyalieli, tyaliéli]
    tyalië+N+Plur+Par+Nom: [tyalieli, tyaliéli]
    tyalië+N+Plur+Par+Acc: [tyalieli, tyaliéli]
    tyalië+N+Plur+Par+Gen: tyalielion
    tyalië+N+Plur+Par+Ins: tyalielínen
    tyalië+N+Plur+Par+All: [tyalielinnar, tyalielinna]
    tyalië+N+Plur+Par+Dat: [tyalielin, tyaliélin]
    tyalië+N+Plur+Par+Loc: [tyalielissen, tyalielisse]
    tyalië+N+Plur+Par+Loc+Short: [tyalielis, tyaliélis]
    tyalië+N+Plur+Par+Abl: [tyalielillon, tyalielillor, tyalielillo]
    tyalië+N+Plur+Par+Poss: tyalielí{w}a
  
  Standard nouns ending in -e:
    # Singular
    aiwë+N+Sing: aiwe
    aiwë+N+Sing+Nom: aiwe
    aiwë+N+Sing+Acc: aiwe
    aiwë+N+Sing+Gen: aiweo
    aiwë+N+Sing+Ins: aiwenen
    aiwë+N+Sing+All: aiwenna
    aiwë+N+Sing+Dat: aiwen
    aiwë+N+Sing+Loc: aiwesse
    aiwë+N+Sing+Loc+Short: aiwes
    aiwë+N+Sing+Abl: aiwello
    aiwë+N+Sing+Poss: aiwe{w}a
    # Dual
    aiwë+N+Dual: [aiwet, aiwu]
    aiwë+N+Dual+Nom: [aiwet, aiwu]
    aiwë+N+Dual+Acc: [aiwet, aiwu]
    aiwë+N+Dual+Gen: [aiweto, aiwuo]
    aiwë+N+Dual+Ins: [aiwenten, aiwunen]
    aiwë+N+Dual+All: [aiwenta, aiwunna]
    aiwë+N+Dual+Dat: [aiwent, aiwun, aiwuen]
    aiwë+N+Dual+Loc: [aiwetse, aiwusse]
    aiwë+N+Dual+Loc+Short: aiwus  # also aiwetes ???
    aiwë+N+Dual+Abl: [aiwelto, aiwullo]
    aiwë+N+Dual+Poss: ['aiwet{w}a', 'aiwu{w}a']
    # Plural
    aiwë+N+Plur: aiwi
    aiwë+N+Plur+Nom: aiwi
    aiwë+N+Plur+Acc: aiwi
    aiwë+N+Plur+Gen: aiwion
    aiwë+N+Plur+Ins: aiwínen
    aiwë+N+Plur+All: aiwennar
    aiwë+N+Plur+Dat: aiwín
    aiwë+N+Plur+Loc: aiwessen
    aiwë+N+Plur+Loc+Short: aiwís
    aiwë+N+Plur+Abl: [aiwellon, aiwellor]
    aiwë+N+Plur+Poss: aiwí{w}a
    # Partitive Plural
    aiwë+N+Plur+Par: aiweli
    aiwë+N+Plur+Par+Nom: aiweli
    aiwë+N+Plur+Par+Acc: aiweli
    aiwë+N+Plur+Par+Gen: aiwelion
    aiwë+N+Plur+Par+Ins: aiwelínen
    aiwë+N+Plur+Par+All: [aiwelinnar, aiwelinna]
    aiwë+N+Plur+Par+Dat: aiwelin
    aiwë+N+Plur+Par+Loc: [aiwelissen, aiwelisse]
    aiwë+N+Plur+Par+Loc+Short: aiwelis
    aiwë+N+Plur+Par+Abl: [aiwelillon, aiwelillor, aiwelillo]
    aiwë+N+Plur+Par+Poss: aiwelí{w}a
